Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.470

Correctional industries workers.

All records, documents, data, and other materials obtained under the requirements of RCW 72.09.115 from an existing correctional industries class I work program participant or an applicant for a proposed new or expanded class I correctional industries work program are exempt from public disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 427.]